Utah statutes.
9-4-919.   Corporation notes, bonds, obligations -- Legal investments.
(1)  The notes, bonds, and other obligations issued under the authority of
this part are declared to be securities in which all public officers and
public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all banks, bankers,
savings banks, trust companies, credit unions, savings and loan associations,
building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons
carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and insurance
associations, and others carrying on an insurance business, and all
administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries,
pension, profit-sharing and retirement funds, and all other persons who may
now or may later be authorized to invest in notes, bonds, or other obligations
of the state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital
belonging to them or within their control.
(2)  These notes, bonds, and other obligations are declared securities which
may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state, county,
or municipal officer, or agency of the state for any purpose for which the
deposit of notes, bonds, or other obligations of the state is now or may later
be authorized by law.
